New York, session 2025-2026, S4900.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 9-117.2 to read as follows: 3 § 9-117.2 Requirements for appointments of uniformed force of the 4 department of correction. a. The commissioner of correction shall not 5 appoint any person as a uniformed correction officer of the department 6 of correction unless such person is not less than twenty-one years of 7 age as of the date of appointment nor more than thirty-five years of age 8 as of the date when the applicant is appointed or eligible to compete in 9 a promotion examination pursuant to paragraph one of subdivision b of 10 section 9-117 of this chapter. 11 b. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or affect the 12 existing authority of the mayor and commissioner to appoint non-uni- 13 formed persons, whose duties include overall security of the department 14 of correction, to positions of authority. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law and shall apply to appointments established on or 17 after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09782-01-5